District of Columbia statutes.
49-503

General courts-martial.

General courts-martial for the trial of commissioned officers or enlisted men shall be ordered by the President of the United States or Commanding General at such times as the interests of the service may require.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 779, ch. 328, § 51
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 634, ch. 146, § 56
1981 Ed., § 39-803.
1973 Ed., § 39-703.